Alabama, session 2026rs, SB361.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
10 Section 1. For purposes of this act, the following
11 terms have the following meanings:
12 (1) ADEQUATE FOOD. Food that is offered in suitable
13 intervals and in sufficient amounts to prevent starvation or
14 significant risk to a dog's health from lack of food.
15 (2) ADEQUATE WATER. Potable water that is offered in
16 suitable intervals and in sufficient amounts to prevent
17 dehydration or significant risk to a dog's health from lack of
18 water.
19 (3) PROPERLY FITTED. When naturally worn by a dog, a
20 collar or harness that:
21 a. Is appropriately sized for the dog based on the
22 dog's measurements and body weight; and
23 b. Does not choke the dog or impede the dog's normal
24 breathing or swallowing.
25 (4) TETHER. A chain, leash, cable, rope, trolley
26 system, or other similar device used to tie or otherwise
27 connect a dog to a stationary object, including a structure,
28 doghouse, pole, or tree.
Page 1

doghouse, pole, or tree.
SB361 Enrolled
29 Section 2. (a)(1) A person may not tether a dog to a
30 stationary object, including a tree, pole, stake, or
31 structure, unless the dog is tethered via a trolley system in
32 accordance with all of the following:
33 a. The tether is not unreasonably heavy in relation to
34 the weight of the dog.
35 b. The tether does not allow the dog to leave the
36 property of the owner or person responsible for the dog.
37 c. The tether is connected to only one dog.
38 d. The tether is attached to a properly fitted collar
39 or harness worn by the dog.
40 e. The tether has a swivel on both ends to minimize
41 tangling.
42 f. The tether allows the dog continuous access at all
43 times to adequate food, adequate water, and shelter as
44 described in Section 3.
45 g. The tether does not extend over an object or edge
46 that could result in injury or strangulation of the dog.
47 h. The tether is situated in a manner to prevent
48 entanglement with other objects or animals.
49 (2) A logging chain, choke collar, or pinch collar may
50 not be used to tether a dog.
51 (b) A person may not restrain or restrict a dog's
52 movement by confining the dog within an enclosure unless in
53 accordance with all of the following:
54 (1) The enclosure is secure, fully fenced, and has
55 adequate space for the dog to freely move around.
56
Page 2

SB361 Enrolled
57 (2) The dog has continuous access at all times to
58 adequate food, adequate water, and shelter as described in
59 Section 3.
60 (3) The enclosure does not allow the dog to leave the
61 property of the owner or person responsible for the dog.
62 (c) Subsections (a) and (b) do not apply to any of the
63 following:
64 (1) A licensed veterinary practice that tethers or
65 confines a dog in the course of its practice.
66 (2) A boarding kennel or public or private animal
67 shelter with secure enclosures for the temporary boarding or
68 housing of dogs.
69 (3) An exhibition, trial, show, contest, or other
70 temporary event in which skill, breeding, or stamina of a dog
71 is judged or examined.
72 (4) A dog that is used for obedience purposes or
73 receives training in a lawful manner to hunt or retrieve
74 wildlife.
75 (5) A service or assistance dog.
76 (6) A licensed grooming shop or facility during the
77 grooming of a dog.
78 (7) Any temporary circumstance during which tethering
79 or confining a dog is necessary but not exceeding a reasonable
80 amount of time with respect to the weather.
81 (8) An individual walking a dog on a leash.
82 (9) A commercial dog breeder licensed by the United
83 States Department of Agriculture as a Class A dealer pursuant
84 to the Animal Welfare Act, 7 U.S.C. § 2131 et seq.
Page 3

to the Animal Welfare Act, 7 U.S.C. § 2131 et seq.
SB361 Enrolled
85 Section 3. In addition to any other requirement by law,
86 a person leaving or keeping a dog tethered or confined outside
87 shall provide the dog with access to shelter that complies
88 with all of the following:
89 (1) Allows the dog to remain dry and protected from the
90 elements and inclement weather, including providing shade for
91 the dog and containing bedding for cold weather when
92 necessary.
93 (2) Is fully-enclosed with an adequate opening for
94 ingress and egress and has a solid floor.
95 (3) Has space for the dog to stand up, turn around, lie
96 down in a normal position, and extend its limbs.
97 (4) Is constructed or manufactured of durable materials
98 and provides adequate ventilation.
99 (5) Is free from accumulated waste, standing water, and
100 debris.
101 (6) Allows the dog unlimited access to the shelter.
102 Section 4. This act does not apply to any of the
103 following:
104 (1) A dog whose purpose is or that is receiving
105 training in conduct that is directly related to the business
106 of shepherding or herding livestock, cultivating agricultural
107 products, hunting, or retrieving.
108 (2) An individual tethering or confining a dog near a
109 place of business while the individual is inside or otherwise
110 interacting with the business, so long as:
111 a. The dog is tethered or confined for a reasonable
112 amount of time with respect to the weather; and
Page 4

amount of time with respect to the weather; and
SB361 Enrolled
113 b. The dog is tethered or confined in a reasonable
114 location near the place of business.
115 (3) The temporary tethering or confining of a dog at
116 any campsite, recreation area, or home so long as the dog is
117 tethered or confined for a reasonable amount of time with
118 respect to the weather.
119 Section 5. (a) The governing body of a county or
120 municipality may appoint one or more animal control officers
121 to investigate alleged violations of this act. An
122 investigating officer shall not be required to be a certified
123 law enforcement officer.
124 (b) Upon having probable cause that a violation of this
125 act has occurred, a certified law enforcement officer,
126 including those serving as animal control officers, may do
127 either of the following:
128 (1) Remove a dog from its present location if he or she
129 believes the animal's life is in danger.
130 (2) Order the owner to provide care to the dog at the
131 owner's expense to comply with this act.
132 (c) The removal of a dog or the issuance of an order to
133 provide care to a dog shall be subject to the hearing and
134 disposition requirements and procedures provided in Sections
135 13A-11-244 and 13A-11-245, Code of Alabama 1975.
136 (d) A county, municipality, animal control officer, or
137 certified law enforcement officer, acting in good faith, may
138 not be liable for any actions taken pursuant to this act,
139 regardless of whether a dog that is removed is returned to its
140 owner.
Page 5

owner.
SB361 Enrolled
141 (e) Nothing in this act shall prevent or limit a law
142 enforcement officer from seeking a warrant to enter private
143 property to enforce this act.
144 (f) A property owner, animal owner, or person
145 responsible for a dog shall not be liable for any injury to a
146 certified law enforcement officer or animal control officer
147 that occurs while the officer is attempting to seize, remove,
148 or take custody of a dog pursuant to this act, provided the
149 property owner, animal owner, or person responsible for the
150 dog has not intentionally caused the injury.
151 Section 6. A person who violates this act shall pay the
152 full costs of boarding and providing veterinarian care to the
153 dog and be guilty of a Class C misdemeanor for a first
154 violation, a Class B misdemeanor for a second violation, and a
155 Class A misdemeanor for a third and any subsequent violation.
156 Section 7. Nothing in this act shall be construed to
157 limit the authority of any law enforcement officer or animal
158 control officer to enforce applicable animal cruelty or
159 neglect laws.
160 Section 8. This act shall become effective on October
161 1, 2026.
Page 6

1, 2026.
SB361 Enrolled
162
163
164
165
166
167
168 ________________________________________________
169 President and Presiding Officer of the Senate
170
171
172
173 ________________________________________________
174 Speaker of the House of Representatives
175
176
177 SB361
178 Senate 12-Mar-26
179 I hereby certify that the within Act originated in and passed
180 the Senate.
181
182 Patrick Harris,
183 Secretary.
184
185
186
187
188 House of Representatives
189 Amended and passed: 08-Apr-26
190
191
192
193
194 Senate concurred in House amendment 08-Apr-26
195
196
197
198
199 By: Senator Gudger
Page 7